Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7547.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 12-25-20 and 12-25-21 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-25
entitled "Criminal Injuries Compensation" are hereby amended to read as follows:
12-25-20. Offenses to which chapter applies.
The office may award compensation in accordance with the provisions of this chapter for
personal injury or death which resulted from offenses in the following categories:
(1) Assault with intent to commit murder, robbery, or rape;
(2) Assault with a dangerous weapon;
(3) Assault and battery;
(4) Mayhem;
(5) Indecent assault and battery on a child under thirteen (13) years of age;
(6) Arson or statutory burning;
(7) Kidnapping;
(8) Robbery or larceny from that person;
(9) Murder;
(10) Manslaughter;
(11) First or second degree sexual assault;
(12) Child molestation, first or second degree;
(13) The abominable and detestable crime against nature or assault with intent to commit
the abominable and detestable crime against nature Stalking pursuant to § 11-59-2;

(14) Driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs;
(15) Refusal by a driver to submit to a chemical test for alcohol or drugs in the immediate
aftermath of a collision;
(16) Driving so as to endanger, resulting in death, pursuant to § 31-27-1;
(17) Driving so as to endanger, resulting in personal injury, pursuant to § 31-27-1.1;
(18) Any other crime excluding motor vehicle offenses other than those enumerated in this
section which results in personal injury or death; and
(19) Failure to stop by a driver in circumstances which result in the death of any person,
pursuant to § 31-26-1.
12-25-21. Nature of compensation.
(a) The office may award compensation under this chapter for:
(1) Expenses actually and reasonably incurred as a result of the personal injury or death of
the victim;
(2) Pecuniary loss to the dependents of the deceased victim;
(3) Any other pecuniary loss resulting from the personal injury or death of the victim, the
amount of which the office finds upon the evidence to be reasonable and necessary;
(4) The administrator may issue a supplemental award for compensation for additional
medical expenses, including psychiatric care and mental health counseling, provided that the victim
provides proper documentation that the additional medical expenses have been actually and
reasonably incurred as a direct result of the personal injury. The administrator shall issue a
supplemental award as long as the total award does not exceed the maximum award allowable
under this chapter;
(5) The administrator may issue an award for expenses related to psychiatric care and
mental health counseling for a parent, spouse, sibling or child of a victim who dies as a direct result
of a violent crime as defined in this chapter, provided that the parent, spouse, sibling or child
provide proper documentation that the psychiatric care and mental health counseling have been
actually and reasonably incurred as a direct result of the death of the victim; and
(6) The administrator may issue an award for expenses related to psychiatric care and
mental health counseling for a secondary victim, provided that the secondary victim provides
proper documentation that the psychiatric care and mental health counseling have been actually
and reasonably incurred as a direct result of witnessing the homicide of a victim or the domestic
violence incident against a victim. An award issued to a secondary victim for psychiatric care and
mental health counseling shall not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) and shall not
be paid upon a secondary victim reaching the age of eighteen (18); and
LC004643 - Page 2 of 4

(7) Where an individual has been the victim of stalking, the administrator may only award
emergency compensation for relocation or for reasonable modifications to a victim’s residence
under § 12-25-21.1. Victims of stalking shall not be entitled to compensation for any other expense
unless they were the victim of another compensable offense under § 12-25-20.
(b) In determining the amount of the judgment or order approving a settlement, the office
shall take into consideration the rates and amounts payable for injuries and death under other
statutes of this state and of the United States, and the amount of revenue in the violent crimes
indemnity account and the number and nature of claims pending against it. The office shall make
every effort to ensure that compensation awards are paid within six (6) months of the date of
application.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004643
========
LC004643 - Page 3 of 4